Maine, session 132, LD1539.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §1536, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2015, c. 267, Pt. L, §8, is
further amended to read:
A. Eighty percent to the stabilization fund; and
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §1536, sub-§1, ¶G, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 398, Pt. ZZZ, §3,
is amended to read:
G. Twenty Nineteen percent to the Highway and Bridge Capital program, Other
Special Revenue Funds account.; and
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §1536, sub-§1, ¶H is enacted to read:
H. One percent to the State Employee Compensation Stabilization Fund under section
7066.
Sec. 4. 5 MRSA §7066 is enacted to read:
§7066. State Employee Compensation Stabilization Fund
The State Employee Compensation Stabilization Fund, referred to in this section as
"the fund," is established within and administered by the Department of Administrative and
Financial Services.
1. Use of funds. Amounts in the fund must be expended to augment the salaries of
state employees to provide parity between the salaries of state employees and the salaries
of comparable positions in the public and private sectors as determined by a market pay
study under section 7061, subsection 4, paragraph B or another market pay study
conducted, contracted or reviewed by the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services and as agreed upon through negotiations with the labor organization that
represents state employees.
2. Funds received; investments; unexpended balances. The fund is funded by
revenue received pursuant to section 1536, subsection 1, paragraph H. Amounts in the fund
may be invested as provided by law, and interest earned by the fund is credited to the fund.
Unexpended balances in the fund at the end of the fiscal year may not lapse but must be
carried forward to the next fiscal year.
For purposes of this section, "state employee" has the same meaning as in Title 26,
section 979-A, subsection 6.